regression_test_data/speling/expected-pruned-output.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 3
	Sdefs: 3
	Paradigms: 1
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools speling-pruned regression_test_data/speling/speling-prune-test prune.dix

-->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>hHoOuUsSeEcCaAtTdDgG</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="pl" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
		<pardef n="house__n">
		<e>
				<l></l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
		</e>

		<e>
				<l>s</l>
				<r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
		</e>

		</pardef>
	</pardefs>

	<section id="main" type="standard">
		<e lm="house">
				<i>house</i>
				<par n="house__n"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="cat">
				<i>cat</i>
		<!-- cat__n' was replaced -->
				<par n="house__n"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="dog">
				<i>dog</i>
		<!-- dog__n' was replaced -->
				<par n="house__n"/> 
		</e>

	</section>
</dictionary>
